California statutes. Elections Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Elections Using Voting Systems [14420. - 14422.]

14420.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), before or as soon as the polls are closed, the precinct board shall remove the voted ballots from the ballot container and take them out of the secrecy envelopes or detach them from the secrecy stubs. Where the envelope or stub is also the write-in ballot, and a write-in vote has been registered thereon, the ballot card shall not be separated from the envelope or stub. If two or more separate ballot cards have been used in
 the election, the precinct board shall sort them into groups, each of which shall contain the same series of ballot cards.

(b) After completing the action described in subdivision (a), the precinct board shall count the number of ballot cards in each group, and certify the number of ballots cast on the voting roster as provided by Section 14107. If there is any discrepancy between the number of voters listed in the roster and the number of ballots voted, this fact shall be noted with an explanation of the difference and signed by all the members of the precinct board.

(c) Before or at the close of the polls, the county elections official may direct the precinct board to seal the ballot container and record on forms provided by the elections official the information needed for the reconciliation of ballots required by Section 14405.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 725, Sec. 2.   (AB 363)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14421.

Unless the county elections official has directed the precinct board to seal the ballot container and record information pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14420, the precinct board shall group voted ballot cards and voted separate write-in ballots, as directed by the elections official, and place them in containers. The board shall also place spoiled and void ballots, if any, in containers as directed by the elections official. All of these ballots, along with the containers for
 voted ballot cards, shall be placed in one or more boxes, which shall then be sealed and delivered as soon as possible to the receiving centers or central counting places with the unused ballots, supplies, and other materials as directed by the elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 725, Sec. 3.   (AB 363)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14422.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the county elections official may direct a precinct board to seal the ballot container prior to the closing of the polls, in accordance with the procedures set forth in Sections 14420 and 14421.

 (2) Notwithstanding Section 14215, as soon as the container is sealed, the county elections official may direct at least two elections
 officials to remove the sealed ballot container of voted untallied ballots from the polling place and the presence of any bystanders and to deliver the container to a receiving center or central counting place as directed.

(3) At least 48 hours in advance of an election, the elections official shall notify the public of the dates, times, and places at which ballot containers will be delivered pursuant to this subdivision.

(b) Upon receipt of a container at a receiving center or central counting place pursuant to subdivision (a), the county elections official may process the voted untallied ballots, but shall not tally the ballots or release any results prior to the closing of the polls.

(c) The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations addressing the secure delivery and transfer of ballots to a receiving center or
 central counting place pursuant to this section.

(d) This section shall not be construed as relieving a precinct board of its responsibility to account for ballots pursuant to Section 14405.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 725, Sec. 4.   (AB 363)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Elections Using Vote Centers  [14428. - 14428.]

14428.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 14420, in elections conducted using vote centers, at the end of each voting day, the precinct board shall remove the voted ballots from the ballot container and deliver them to the central receiving center pursuant to Section 14422.

(b) The precinct board shall certify to the election official the number of ballots cast at the vote center on the roster, as well as the number of ballots voted. If there is any discrepancy between the numbers, the discrepancy shall be noted with an explanation of the difference and signed by all members of the precinct board.

(c) The precinct board shall record on forms the information needed for the reconciliation of the ballots required by Section 14405.

(d) For vote centers using tabulating equipment, the precinct board shall record the number of ballots cast on each voting device and securely seal the device to prevent additional ballots from being cast until the next day of voting. The precinct board shall record all seals used for this procedure on a log for each vote center.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14228 by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 66.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Return of Supplies to the Clerk [14430. - 14435.]

14430.

The precinct board, as soon after the polls are closed as possible, shall prepare the supplies, including the copies of the voter list or roster posted at or near the polling place, and records of the election for delivery to the elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 69.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14431.

The precinct board shall enclose and seal in one or more packages, as determined by the elections official, all voted, spoiled, canceled, or unused ballots.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14432.

The precinct board shall enclose and seal in one or two packages, as determined by the elections official, all of the following:

(a) Two tally sheets, if ballots are to be tabulated manually at the precinct.

(b) The roster. If an electronic poll book is used, either or both the electronic poll book and the electronic media containing the roster shall be secured and
 returned to the elections official.

(c) The copy of the voter list. If an electronic voter list is used, either or both the electronic voter list and the electronic media containing the voter list shall be secured and returned to the elections official.

(d) The challenge list.

(e) The assisted voter’s list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 70.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14433.

If ballots are counted at precincts pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 15340) or Article 5 (commencing with Section 15360) of Chapter 4 of Division 15, the precinct board immediately shall transmit, unsealed, to the elections official a statement showing the result of the votes cast at the polling place. The statement shall be open to public inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14434.

The sealed packages containing the lists, papers, and ballots shall be delivered by two of its members without delay, unopened, to the elections official or to a receiving station designated by the elections official.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14435.

No list, tally, paper, or certificate returned from any election shall be set aside or rejected for want of form, nor because it is not strictly in accordance with this code, if it can be satisfactorily understood.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Snap Tallies [14440. - 14443.]

14440.

Before any election, the governing body of the jurisdiction holding the election shall decide that certain offices or measures to be voted on are of more than ordinary public interest and require an early tabulation and announcement. The decision shall be transmitted to the elections official not less than 30 days before the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14441.

The elections official shall prepare and forward to each selected precinct forms containing a list of the offices and measures designated as being of more than ordinary interest, and stating the number of ballots to be counted for the snap tally. In each general election, the special form shall, for each office listed on it, include the names of all candidates for that office whose names appear on the ballot.

The inspector at each selected precinct shall note the results of the count and the total number of votes cast in
 the precinct on the snap tally forms as soon as the designated number of ballots has been tallied. The inspector shall then communicate the figures in the manner directed by the elections official. In each general election, the figures shall include the votes cast for every candidate whose name appears on the ballot for an office listed on the forms. The inspector shall continue, each time the designated number of ballots have been tallied, to note and report the results as directed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14442.

Upon receipt from the precincts of the reports of votes cast on the specially designated offices and measures, the elections official shall tabulate the results and make the results available to the public. In each general election, all these reports of the election results shall include the votes cast for all candidates whose names appear on the ballot for each office for which returns are reported.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14443.

If ballots are counted by electronic or electromechanical means, the elections official may provide for early tabulation and announcement of the returns in a manner consistent with the use of the tabulating devices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 48.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 15. SEMIFINAL OFFICIAL CANVASS, OFFICIAL CANVASS, RECOUNT, AND TIE VOTE PROCEDURES [15000. - 15702.]



CHAPTER 1. Preparation for Canvass [15000. - 15007.]

15000.

No later than seven days prior to any election conducted pursuant to this code, the elections official shall conduct a test or series of tests to ensure that every device used to tabulate ballots accurately records each vote. The exact methods employed in this test shall conform to the voting procedures for the specific voting systems, as adopted by the Secretary of State.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15001.

(a) A copy of each election computer vote count program for a statewide election or state special election to fill vacancies shall be deposited with the Secretary of State. The copy of the election computer vote count program shall be received by the Secretary of State no later than 5 p.m. on the seventh day before the election.

(b) If the election computer vote count program is modified or altered after the submission specified in subdivision (a), the elections official immediately shall deposit the subsequent program
 no later than 12 p.m. on the day of the election.

(c) The Secretary of State shall hold the deposited programs for a period of not less than six months, at which time the program shall be returned to the elections official.

(1) The elections official shall preserve the returned program for a period of 16 months.

(2) The programs deposited in accordance with this section shall be used only for a recanvass of the vote, an official recount, court action, or for logic and accuracy tests required by the Secretary of State.

(3) Any tape, diskette, cartridge, or other magnetic or electronic storage medium containing the vote count program submitted pursuant to this section shall be maintained by the Secretary of State in a secure location when not in use for
 an official purpose specified in paragraph (2).

(d) The Secretary of State may, by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding, require and compel the county elections officials to submit the computer vote count program specified in subdivision (a). Venue for a proceeding under this section shall be exclusively in Sacramento County.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15002.

No later than January 1 of each even-numbered year, the Secretary of State shall review, and if necessary amend, administrative procedures for use with each of the voting systems pursuant to Division 19.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15003.

Elections officials shall adopt semifinal official and official canvass procedures to conform to the applicable voting system procedures that have been approved by the Secretary of State. These procedures shall be available for public inspection no later than 29 days before each election.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15004.

(a) Each qualified political party may employ, and may have present at the central counting place or places, not more than two representatives to check and review the preparation and operation of the tabulating devices, their programming and testing, and have the representatives in attendance at any or all phases of the election.

(b) Any bona fide association of citizens or a media organization may employ, and may have present at the central counting place or places, not more than two representatives to check and
 review the preparation and operation of the tabulating devices, their programming and testing, and have the representatives in attendance at any or all phases of the election.

(c) The county elections official may limit the total number of representatives employed pursuant to subdivision (b) in attendance to no more than 10 by a manner in which each interested bona fide association of citizens or media organization has an equal opportunity to participate. Any representatives employed and in attendance pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be subject to the limit specified in this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 690, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

15006.

(a) (1) The Attorney General shall provide guidance and information to county elections officials regarding how elections officials, precinct boards, election workers, and election volunteers should respond to requests by an agent of a law enforcement agency to access areas where ballots are cast, handled, processed, counted, tabulated, tallied, audited, or recounted.

(2) The Attorney General shall
 publish and provide guidance to managers of election sites regarding how to respond to requests by an agent of a law enforcement agency to access areas where ballots are cast, handled, processed, counted, tabulated, tallied, audited, or recounted.

(b) The guidance and information provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be developed in consultation with the Secretary of State, be consistent with federal and state law, and aim to ensure that all voting locations remain safe and accessible to all voters.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “law enforcement agency” means all of the following:

(1) Any law enforcement agency, department, or other entity of the state or any political subdivision thereof, that employs any peace officer described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the
 Penal Code.

(2) Any law enforcement agency of another state.

(3) Any federal law enforcement agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   (SB 73)   Effective May 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15007.

(a) A peace officer shall not interfere in any manner with the administration of any election in this state and in the discharge of duties by the Secretary of State, a county elections official, an election worker, or a volunteer performing required elections-related tasks prescribed by this code or any other provision of state law except as necessary to respond to urgent threats to public health and safety.

(b) The following persons may bring a civil
 action to enforce the provisions of this section:

(1) The Attorney General.

(2) The Secretary of State.

(3) A county elections official with respect to violations that occur within the elections official’s county.

(c) A court shall expedite the scheduling and disposition of a civil action brought pursuant to this section if the action is filed during the period beginning thirty days before election day and ending with the completion of the canvass.

(d) The provisions of this section shall not prevent a qualified elector from exercising their right to vote in an election in this state and shall not be construed to authorize an action that would be prohibited by federal law or to limit any
 federal authority that is validly exercised pursuant to federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 10, Sec. 2.   (SB 73)   Effective May 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Vote by Mail Ballot Processing [15100. - 15112.]

15100.

The provisions of this chapter apply to the processing of vote by mail ballots during the 29-day period before any election, during the semifinal official canvass, and during the official canvass.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 86.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15101.

(a) An elections official may begin to process vote by mail ballot return envelopes and vote by mail ballots on the date on which the ballots are mailed, which shall not be later than 29 days before the election.

(b) (1) Processing vote by mail ballot return envelopes may include verifying the voter’s signature on the vote by mail ballot return envelope pursuant to Section 3019 and updating voter history records.

(2) Processing vote by mail ballots includes opening vote by mail ballot return envelopes, removing ballots, duplicating any damaged ballots, and preparing the ballots to be machine read, or machine
 reading them, including processing write-in votes so that they can be tallied by the machine, but under no circumstances may a vote count be accessed or released until 8 p.m. on the day of the election.

(c) Results of any vote by mail ballot tabulation or count shall not be released before the close of the polls on the day of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   (AB 16)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15102.

The official shall appoint a special counting board or boards in numbers that he or she deems adequate to count the vote by mail ballots. The official shall provide for the forms of tally books and the distribution of the duties of the members of the canvassing board.

When the tally is done by hand, there shall be no less than four persons for each office or proposition to be counted. One shall read from the ballot, the second shall keep watch for any error or improper vote, and the other two shall keep the tally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 88.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15103.

The elections official shall pay a reasonable compensation to each member of the canvassing board of vote by mail ballots. This compensation shall be paid out of the treasury of the agency conducting the election as other claims against it are paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15104.

(a) The processing of vote by mail ballot return envelopes, and the processing and counting of vote by mail ballots, shall be open to the public, both prior to and after the election.

(b) A member of the county grand jury, and at least one member each of the Republican county central committee, the Democratic county central committee, and of any other party with a candidate on the ballot, and any other interested organization, shall be permitted to observe and challenge the manner in which the vote by mail ballots are handled, from the processing of vote by mail ballot return envelopes through the counting and disposition of the ballots.

(c) The elections official shall notify vote by mail voter
 observers and the public at least 48 hours in advance of the dates, times, and places where vote by mail ballots will be processed and counted.

(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2194, vote by mail voter observers shall be allowed sufficiently close access to enable them to observe the vote by mail ballot return envelopes and the signatures thereon and challenge whether those individuals handling vote by mail ballots are following established procedures, including all of the following:

(1) Verifying signatures on the vote by mail ballot return envelopes by comparing them to voter registration information.

(2) Duplicating accurately damaged or defective ballots.

(3) Securing vote by mail ballots to prevent tampering with them before they are counted.

(4) Verifying signatures on statements completed pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 3019.

(e) A vote by mail voter observer shall not interfere with the orderly processing of vote by mail ballot return envelopes or the processing and counting of vote by mail ballots, including the touching or handling of the ballots.

(f) A vote by mail voter observer shall not be permitted to challenge a signature on a vote by mail ballot return envelope pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3019, or on statements completed pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section
 3019, on the basis that they believe the signature does not compare with the signatures appearing in the voter’s registration record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 10, Sec. 3.   (SB 73)   Effective May 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15105.

Challenges to a vote by mail voter may be made for the same reasons as those made against a voter voting at a polling place. In addition, a challenge may be entered on the grounds that the ballot was not received within the time provided by this code or that a person is
 currently serving a state or federal prison term for the conviction of a felony. All challenges shall be made prior to the opening of the identification envelope of the challenged vote by mail voter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 29.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

15106.

Except as otherwise provided, the processing of vote by mail ballot return envelopes, the processing and counting of vote by mail ballots, and the disposition of challenges of vote by mail ballots shall be according to the laws now in force pertaining to the election for which they are cast. Because the voter is not present, the challenger shall have the burden of establishing extraordinary proof of the validity of the challenge at the time the challenge is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 92.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15107.

If a challenge is overruled, the board shall open the identification envelope without defacing the affidavit printed on it or mutilating the enclosed ballot and, without viewing the ballot, remove it and destroy the numbered slip, if any remains, and store the ballots in a secure location.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15108.

If a challenge is allowed, the board shall endorse on the face of the identification envelope the cause of the challenge and its action thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15109.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the counting and canvassing of vote by mail ballots shall be conducted in the same manner and under the same regulations as used for ballots cast in a precinct polling place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 93.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15110.

Reports to the Secretary of State of the findings of the canvass of vote by mail ballots shall be made by the elections official pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 15150) and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15300).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 94.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15111.

The elections official shall keep an accurate list of all voters who have received and voted a vote by mail ballot at each election and compare this list with the roster as provided in Section 15278. That list shall include the election precinct of the voter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 71.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

15112.

When elections are consolidated pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 10000), and only one form of ballot is used at the consolidated election, the ballots cast by vote by mail voters shall be counted only in connection with elections to which vote by mail voter privileges have been extended by law.

Whenever the period of time within which vote by mail voters’ ballots shall be received by the elections official in order to be counted, as provided for any election by this code or any other law of this state, is different from that period of time provided for another election, and the elections are consolidated and only one form of ballot used for both elections, all vote by mail voters’ ballots issued for the consolidated election may be counted for both elections if received by the elections official within whichever period of time is longer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Semifinal Official Canvass [15150. - 15290.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [15150. - 15154.]

15150.

For every election, the elections official shall conduct a semifinal official canvass by tabulating vote by mail and precinct ballots and compiling the results. The semifinal official canvass shall commence immediately upon the close of the polls and shall continue without adjournment until all precincts are accounted for.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15151.

(a) The elections official shall transmit the semifinal official results to the Secretary of State in the manner and according to the schedule prescribed by the Secretary of State prior to each election, for the following:

(1) All candidates voted for statewide office.

(2) All candidates voted for the following offices:

(A) State Assembly.

(B) State Senate.

(C) Member of the United States House of Representatives.

(D) Member of the State Board of Equalization.

(E) Justice of the Court of Appeals.

(3) All persons voted for at the presidential primary or for electors of President and Vice President of the United States.

(4) Statewide ballot measures.

(b) The elections official shall transmit the results to the Secretary of State at intervals no greater than two hours, following commencement of the semifinal official canvass.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 72, Sec. 4.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

15152.

Neither the elections official, any member of a precinct board, nor any other person shall count any votes, either for a ballot proposition or candidate, until the close of the polls in that county. After that time, the ballots for all candidates and ballot propositions voted upon solely within the county shall be counted and the results of the balloting made public. However, the results for any candidate or ballot proposition also voted upon in another county or counties shall not be made public until after all the polls in that county and the other county or counties have closed. This paragraph applies regardless of whether the counting is done by manual tabulation or by a vote tabulating device.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15153.

During the semifinal official canvass, write-in votes shall be counted in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 15340) of Chapter 4.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15154.

(a) Any ballot that is not marked as provided by law shall be rejected. The rejected ballots shall be placed in the package marked for voted ballots or in a separate container as directed by the elections official. All rejected ballots shall have written on the ballot the cause for rejection and be signed by a majority of processing board members who are assigned by the elections official to process ballots.

(b) The following ballot conditions shall not render a ballot invalid:

(1) Soiled or defaced.

(2) Two or more impressions of the voting stamp or mark in one voting square.

(3) Contains personal information, as defined in Section 14287.

(c) If a voter indicates, either by a combination of both marking and writing in, a choice of more names than there are candidates to be elected or nominated for any office, or if for any reason the choice of the voter is impossible to determine, the vote for that office shall not be counted, but the remainder of the ballot, if properly marked, shall be counted.

(d) This section applies to all ballots counted pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15300).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 739, Sec. 3.   (SB 183)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Automated Count in a Central Location [15200. - 15213.]

15200.

If paper ballots are used in conjunction with this system, counting shall be as provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 15270) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 15290).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15201.

(a) As soon as the polls are closed, the precinct board shall, in the presence of the public do all of the following:

(1) Seal the container used to transport voted ballots and insure that the precinct number, or in an election conducted using a voter center, the vote center number, is designated on the ballot container.

(2) Certify, sign, and seal the several packages or envelopes as directed by the elections official.

(3) By not less than two of their number, deliver the ballot container and packages to the elections
 official at the central counting place in the manner prescribed by the elections official. The ballot container and packages shall remain in their exclusive possession until delivered to the elections official.

(b) This section also applies to ballots counted manually pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 15290).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 72.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

15202.

If the ballots are to be counted at a central counting place, no fewer than two precinct board members shall, following the close of the polls, deliver the ballots, in a sealed container, to the central counting place or a designated receiving station. There may be two or more central counting places.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15203.

The vote tabulating device may be located at any place within the state approved by the elections official of the county or other political subdivision using the device. The same device may be jointly owned, borrowed, leased, or used by two or more counties, cities, or other political subdivisions to tabulate ballots cast in any election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.

All proceedings at the central counting place, or counting places, if applicable, shall be open to the view of the public but no person, except one employed and designated for the purpose by the elections official or his or her authorized deputy, shall touch any ballot container. Access to the area where electronic data processing equipment is being operated may be restricted to those persons authorized by the elections official.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15205.

(a) A person may be employed to count, tally, and certify the ballots if he or she is not a candidate at the election and if he or she satisfies either of the following requirements:

(1) Has the qualifications required for a precinct board member.

(2) Is a deputy or employee of either of the following:

(A) The governing board.

(B) The elections official.

(b) No person selected to count ballots need reside in any particular precinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15206.

The elections official or any deputy authorized by the elections official may excuse or dismiss any person from any counting board and enforce the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15207.

The elections official or authorized deputy shall segregate the persons employed to count the ballots into counting boards. These counting boards shall be deemed to be precinct boards, and are subject to all laws governing precinct boards where ballots are counted at the polling place.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15208.

(a) Each container of ballots shall be opened and its contents removed. The ballots shall be checked to ascertain if the ballots are properly grouped and shall be arranged, if necessary, so that all similar ballots from the precinct are together.

 (b) Any ballot that
 contains personal information, as defined in Section 14287, or is torn, bent, or mutilated shall be segregated in the manner directed by the elections official and a duplicate shall be prepared as provided in Section 15210.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 739, Sec. 4.   (SB 183)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

15209.

Any magnetic or electronic storage medium, or copy thereof, used for the ballot tabulation program and any magnetic or electronic storage medium, or copy thereof, containing election results shall be kept in a secure location and shall be retained for 6 months following any local election and 22 months following any federal election or so long thereafter as any contest involving the vote at the local or federal election remains undetermined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 605, Sec. 5.   (SB 1328)   Effective September 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

15210.

In preparing the voted ballots for processing, any ballot that is torn, bent, or otherwise defective shall be corrected so that every vote cast by the voter shall be counted by the automatic tabulating equipment. If necessary, a true duplicate copy of the defective ballot shall be made and substituted therefor, following the intention of the voter insofar as it can be ascertained from the defective ballot. All duplicate ballots shall be clearly labeled as a duplicate and shall bear a serial number that shall be recorded on the damaged or defective ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 49.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

15212.

If voting at all precincts within a county is not conducted using the same voting system, the result as to the precincts not subject to this article shall be determined in accordance with other provisions of this code and the result of the vote at precincts subject to this article shall be determined as provided in this article. The statement of the vote in that case shall represent the consolidation of all the results and the results of the canvass of all vote by mail voter ballots.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15213.

In case of an emergency in which it becomes impossible to transport the ballots from the precinct to a central counting place, the elections official may direct that the ballots be counted at the precinct. In those cases, counting shall be conducted substantially in accordance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 15270).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Automated Vote Count in Precincts [15250. - 15251.]

15250.

This article applies to all elections in which votes are counted by means of a voting machine at a polling place or vote center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 73.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

15250.5.

(a) As soon as the polls are closed on election day, the precinct board, in the presence of the watchers and all others lawfully present, shall immediately lock the voting machine against voting and do all of the following:

(1) Count the votes cast on voting machines and report the results pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c).

(2) Complete, sign, and return to the elections official all furnished forms requiring its signatures.

(b) When votes are counted on one or more voting machines at the precinct, all members of the precinct board, upon the completion of
 their duties, shall sign a certificate of performance, which shall be substantially in the following form:

Certificate of Performance

This certificate of performance is for polling place or vote center ____, for the ____ election, held on the ____ day of ____, (year).

We hereby certify ONE of the following: (Please check only the one that applies.)⁭(A) RESULTS OF VOTES CAST FROM ALL VOTING MACHINES ARE POSTED.(1) The results of the votes cast form posted outside the polling place includes the total number of votes cast on each voting machine for each candidate for each office, and the total number of votes
 cast on each voting machine for and against each ballot measure.
